Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 6

Limitation of Actions and Immunity

48-58-601. Limitation of and immunity from actions for breach of fiduciary duty.

Any action alleging breach of fiduciary duties by directors or officers, including alleged violations of the standards established in § 48-58-301, §§ 48-58-701 — 48-58-704, or § 48-58-403, must be brought within one (1) year from the date of such breach or violation. In the event the alleged breach or violation is not discovered nor reasonably should have been discovered within that one-year period, the period of limitation shall be one (1) year from the date such was discovered or reasonably should have been discovered. In no event shall any such action be brought more than three (3) years after the date on which the breach or violation occurred, except where there is fraudulent concealment on the part of the defendant, in which case the action shall be commenced within one (1) year after the alleged breach or violation is, or should have been, discovered.

The general assembly finds and declares that the services of nonprofit boards are critical to the efficient conduct and management of the public and charitable affairs of the citizens of this state. Members of such nonprofit boards must be permitted to operate without concern for the possibility of litigation arising from the discharge of their duties as policy makers.

All directors, trustees or members of the governing bodies of nonprofit cooperatives, corporations, clubs, associations and organizations described in subsection (d), whether compensated or not, shall be immune from suit arising from the conduct of the affairs of such cooperatives, corporations, clubs, associations or organizations. Such immunity from suit shall be removed when such conduct amounts to willful, wanton or gross negligence. Notwithstanding other provisions of this subsection (c) to the contrary, all directors, trustees or members of the governing bodies of nonprofit cemetery corporations, associations and organizations referred to in subdivision (d)(6) shall be immune from personal liability only if such cemetery corporations, associations or organizations carry liability insurance coverage in an amount to be determined by the department of commerce and insurance; provided, that such requirement shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than six thousand (6,000) nor more than six thousand one hundred twenty-five (6,125), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census. Nothing in chapters 51-68 of this title shall be construed to grant immunity to the nonprofit cooperative, corporation, association or organization.

Subsection (c) shall apply to the following:

Electric membership corporations organized under former title 65, chapter 24 [repealed];

Electric cooperatives organized under title 65, chapter 25;

Nonprofit corporations, associations and organizations which are exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3)), as amended;

Not-for-profit civic leagues or organizations which are exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(c)(4) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(4)), as amended;

Nonprofit corporations, associations and organizations which are exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(6)), as amended;

Not-for-profit cemetery corporations, associations and organizations which are exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(c)(13) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(13)), as amended;

Not-for-profit agricultural or horticultural organizations which are exempt from federal income taxation under § 501(c)(5) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(5)), as amended;

Nonprofit corporations, associations and organizations that are exempt from federal income taxation under § 115 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (26 U.S.C. § 115), as amended;

Telephone cooperatives organized or, by virtue of conversion or otherwise, operating under title 65, chapter 29;

Public broadcast stations, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 397(6);

Workers' compensation self-insurers pools established in compliance with § 50-6-405(c), by ten (10) or more employers of the same trade or professional association if such trade or professional association is exempt from federal taxation under § 501(c)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code (26 U.S.C., § 501(c)(6));

Not-for-profit corporations or associations which are exempt from federal income taxation under Internal Revenue Code of 1954, § 501(c)(7) (26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(7)), as amended, but only if general liability insurance in a reasonable amount is carried by or on behalf of any such club; and

Workers' compensation self-insurance pooling arrangements between municipal electric systems and rural electric cooperatives established in compliance with title 50, chapter 6, part 7.

In order for the immunity granted by subsection (c) to apply to workers' compensation self-insurers, such insurers must notify in writing each participating employer and applicant for membership in such self-insurance pool of the immunity from liability granted by this section to the directors, trustees or members of the governing bodies of such nonprofit organization. Notification of such immunity shall be given each time an employer makes application for membership in the pool.

Acts 1986, ch. 926, §§ 1-3; T.C.A., §§ 48-1-851 — 48-1-853; Acts 1987, ch. 242, § 8.60; 1987, ch. 403, § 1; 1988, ch. 952, §§ 1, 2; 1989, ch. 214, § 1; 1989, ch. 445, § 28; 1989, ch. 493, § 1; 1989, ch. 479, § 1; 1990, ch. 701, § 1; 1990, ch. 969, § 1; 1991, ch. 304, § 1; 1994, ch. 809, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 675, § 49; 1999, ch. 399, §§ 1-3; 2001, ch. 87, § 1; 2014, ch. 899, § 96.

Compiler's Notes. Title 65, ch. 24, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 1988, ch. 689.

Cross-References. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Liability of director for unlawful distributions, § 48-58-302.

Textbooks. Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), No. 5-1401.

Law Reviews.

Unpacking Limited Liability: Direct and Vicarious Liability of Corporate Participants for Torts of the Enterprise (Robert B. Thompson), 47 Vand. L. Rev. 1 (1994).